District of Columbia statutes.
7-1203.04

Disclosures for collection of fees.

(a)

A mental health professional or mental health facility may disclose the administrative information necessary for the collection of his or its fee from the client to a person authorized by the mental health professional or mental health facility for the collection of a fee from such client if the client or client representative has received a written notification that the fee is due and has failed to arrange for payment with the mental health professional or mental health facility within a reasonable time after such notification.

(b)

In the event of a claim in any civil action for the collection of such a fee, no additional mental health information shall be disclosed in litigation, except to the extent necessary:

(1)

To respond to a motion of the client or client representative for greater specificity; or

(2)

To dispute a defense or counterclaim.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 304, 25 DCR 5055
1981 Ed., § 6-2024.
1973 Ed., § 6-1625.